District of Columbia statutes.
28:1-101

Short titles.

(a)

This subtitle may be cited as the “Uniform Commercial Code”.

(b)

This article may be cited as the “Uniform Commercial Code — General Provisions”.

History

Dec. 30, 1963, 77 Stat. 631, Pub. L. 88-243, § 1
Apr. 27, 2013, D.C. Law 19-299, § 2, 60 DCR 2634

Section References

This section is referenced in § 34-2202.09 and § 42-2704.02.

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 28:1-101.
1973 Ed., § 28:1-101.

Editor's Notes

Section 39(a) of D.C. Law 15-354 provided that Title 28 is designated Title 28 of the District of Columbia Official Code.

D.C. Law 19-299 amended this article in its entirety, substituting present §§ 28:1-101 through 28:1-310 for former §§ 28:1-101 through 28:1-208. Although similar in many respects to former Article 1, the statute sections in the revised Article are sufficiently different that a detailed explanation of the changes was impracticable; however, where possible, the historical citations from the former sections have been transferred to the new, similar sections. Where appropriate, annotations to former sections have also been retained under corresponding sections in the amended article.

Uniform Commercial Code Comment

Source: Former Section 1-101.

Changes from former law: Subsection (b) is new. It is added in order to make the structure of Article 1 parallel with that of the other articles of the Uniform Commercial Code.

1. Each other article of the Uniform Commercial Code (except Articles 10 and 11) may also be cited by its own short title. See Sections 2-101, 2A-101, 3-101, 4-101, 4A-101, 5-101, 6-101, 7-101, 8-101, and 9-101.